Utah statutes.
78A-6-211.   Courtrooms -- Physical facilities.

(1)  Suitable courtrooms and office space in each county shall be provided or made available to the court by the county for the hearing of cases except in counties where the state has provided courtrooms and offices as needed.

(2)  Equipment and supplies for the use of the judges, officers, and employees of the court and the cost of maintaining the juvenile courts shall be paid from the General Fund or other funds for those purposes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

